Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,151
Powers of insurers.

(1) An insurer licensed in this state may, either directly or through a subsidiary or affiliate, organize and operate a health maintenance organization under the Health Maintenance Organization Act. Any two or more such insurers or subsidiaries or affiliates thereof may jointly organize and operate a health maintenance organization. The business of insurance shall include the providing of health care by a health maintenance organization owned or operated by an insurer or a subsidiary thereof.

(2) An insurer may contract with a health maintenance organization to provide insurance or similar protection against the cost of health care services provided through health maintenance organizations and to provide coverage in the event of the failure of the health maintenance organization to meet its obligations. The enrollees of a health maintenance organization shall constitute a permissible group under the insurance laws of this state. An insurer may make benefit payments to health maintenance organizations for health care services rendered by providers under such contracts.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 60.